California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
-------------------------------------------

621.

In any county the assessor, with the approval of the board of supervisors, may give the information required by Section 619, and similar information with reference to personal property, as an alternative to giving the information by United States mail, by having published lists of assessments in newspapers, or by posting the information to the assessor’s Internet Web site, or any combination of the above. In counties of more than 4 million population and counties of more than 1 million population, as determined by the July 1, 1965, Department of Finance revised estimate, which are contiguous to a county with more than 4 million population, the assessor, with the approval of the board of supervisors, may divide the county into publication areas not to exceed five in
 number. Within such areas the assessment listing may be grouped by assessment map books, by post office zones or by such other arrangements as may be determined by the assessor as most likely to give notice to assessees and as practicable for publication in local newspapers. The complete assessment data of one such area may be printed in one year, and for other areas in successive years as directed by him or her until the full county is covered. Each year at least all changes of assessment listings for all the areas shall be printed, together with a notice that no changes were made with regard to properties not on the list of changes, so that all changes will be on a current basis for the entire county. Newspapers for the publications shall be selected as they are for publication of the delinquent tax lists and the rate paid for the advertising shall be the same.

Neither the failure of the assessee to receive this information nor the failure of the assessor to so
 inform the assessee shall in any way affect the validity of any assessment or the validity of any taxes levied pursuant thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 185, Sec. 5.   (SB 1493)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

623.

The assessor may place a single assessment on the roll for all leased personal property in the county that is assessed with respect to the same taxpayer. Any property assessed pursuant to this section shall, in the absence of evidence establishing otherwise, be deemed to be located at the taxpayer’s primary place of business within the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 527, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Information to Other Taxing Agencies [646. - 649.]

646.

The records of the assessor are at all times, during office hours, open to the inspection of any person charged with the duty of assessing property in the county for any taxing agency.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

647.

(a) If any city or lighting, water, or irrigation district, or any district described in Section 2131, on behalf of which the county does the assessing, makes written request, on or before the lien date, for a certified copy of the portion of the secured roll pertaining to property within its limits, the assessor shall comply with the request on or before July 1. Such roll is at all times, during office hours, open to the inspection of any person representing any taxing agency or revenue district, or any district described in Section 2131.

(b) In counties of the first class, if any city or lighting, water or irrigation district, on behalf of which the county does the assessing, makes written request, on or before the lien date, for a certified copy of the portion of the secured roll pertaining to property within its limits, the assessor shall comply with the request on or before the third Monday in August.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

648.

If any city or lighting, water, or irrigation district makes a written request for a description of all property within its limits that is on the unsecured roll, its assessed value, the location of property as reported on a property statement filed pursuant to Section 441, and the name and address, by street and number, of each owner, the assessor shall comply with the request on the first Monday in each month. For purposes of this section, any property assessed pursuant to Section 623 is deemed to be located at the taxpayer’s primary place of business within the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 88, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

649.

The assessor may charge other taxing agencies the actual cost for each copy of the secured roll or description from the unsecured roll furnished them.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1939, Ch. 1008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Appraiser Qualifications [670. - 673.]

670.

(a) No person shall perform the duties or exercise the authority of an appraiser for property tax purposes as an employee of the state, any county or city and county, unless he or she is the holder of a valid appraiser’s or advanced appraiser’s certificate issued by the State Board of Equalization.

(b) The board shall provide for the examination of applicants for these certificates and may contract with the State Personnel Board to give the examinations. Examinations shall be prepared by the board with the advice and assistance of a committee of five assessors selected by the California Assessors’ Association for this purpose. No certificate shall be issued to any person who has not
 attained a passing grade in the examination and demonstrated to the board that he or she is competent to perform the work of an appraiser as that competency is defined in regulations duly adopted by the board. However, any applicant for a certificate who is denied the same shall have a right to a review of that denial in accordance with the State Administrative Procedure Act contained in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(c) Passage of a civil service or merit system examination for appraiser given by the state, or any county or city and county, shall suffice to meet the requirements of this section. The scope of the examination shall be approved by the State Board of Equalization.

(d) No employee of the state, or any county or city and county shall perform the duties or exercise the authority of an auditor or an
 auditor-appraiser under Section 469 or Section 15624 of the Government Code, unless he or she holds a degree with a specialization in accounting from a recognized institution of higher education, or is a licensed accountant in the State of California, or has passed the state, or a county, or city and county, or city civil service or merit system examination regularly given for the position of accountant or auditor by the testing body, or holds the office of assessor.

(e) Except for persons holding the office of assessor, this section does not apply to elected officials.

(f) No charge shall be made to counties or to applicants for examinations and certifications under this section or for training conducted by the board under Section 671.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 201, Sec. 10.   (SB 1462)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

671.

(a) In order to retain a valid appraiser’s certificate every holder shall complete at least 24 hours of training conducted or approved by the State Board of Equalization in each one-year period.

Any excess in training time over the 24-hour minimum accumulated in any one year shall be carried over as credit for future training requirements with a limit of three years in which the carryover time may be credited.

Failure to receive such training shall constitute grounds for revocation of an appraiser’s certificate; provided, however, that proceedings to revoke shall be conducted in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act contained in Chapter 5 (commencing
 with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

Training shall include, but not be limited to, new developments in the case and statutory law and administrative rules.

(b) An advanced appraiser’s certificate shall be issued by the board after an applicant has held an appraiser’s certificate for at least three years and:

(1) Has successfully completed a course of study; or

(2) Has passed an advanced level examination; or

(3) Holds a valid professional designation from a recognized professional organization.

The board, with the advice and assistance of five assessors selected by the California Assessors’ Association, shall prescribe the
 course of study, prepare the advanced level examination, and approve the professional designation.

In order to retain a valid advanced appraiser’s certificate, every holder shall complete at least 12 hours of training in each one-year period.

Any excess in training time for the advanced appraiser’s certificate over the 12-hour minimum accumulated in any one year shall be carried over as a credit for future training requirements with a limit of two years in which the carryover time may be credited.

Failure to receive such training shall constitute grounds for revocation of an advanced appraiser’s certificate; provided, however, that proceedings to revoke shall be conducted in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act contained in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

Training to retain the advanced appraiser’s certificate shall include, but not be limited to, new developments in the case and statutory law and administrative rules.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 201, Sec. 11.   (SB 1462)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

672.

At the time of certification, each applicant shall disclose, on forms provided by the Board of Equalization, his or her financial interest in any corporation. Thereafter, the form shall be completed annually.

If the applicant is also required to annually file with the Fair Political Practices Commission pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 87300) of Chapter 7 of Title 9 of the Government Code, then a duplicate of that filing shall be deemed to meet the requirements of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1465, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

673.

The State Board of Equalization may issue a temporary certificate to a person who is newly employed by the state, any county, city and county, or appraisal commission in order to afford the person the opportunity to apply for and take an examination the successful passage of which would qualify the person for an appraiser’s certificate. A temporary certificate shall not be issued to exceed one year’s duration and shall be issued only to a person who has demonstrated eligibility to take a civil service examination pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 670, or who is found by the board to possess qualifications by reason of education and experience so that he or she may be reasonably expected to be competent to perform the work of an appraiser, or who has been duly elected or appointed to the office of assessor. A temporary certificate shall not be renewed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 940, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8.5. Assessment Analyst Certificates [674. - 680.]

674.

(a) An assessor or any person employed by the office of the county assessor shall not make decisions with regard to changes in ownership unless he or she is the holder of a valid assessment analyst certificate issued by the board.

(b) 
 An assessor or any person employed by the office of the county assessor shall not make decisions with regard to property tax exemptions, except for homeowners’ exemption claims, unless he or she is the holder of a valid assessment analyst certificate issued by the board.

(c) The board shall provide for the examination of applicants for an assessment analyst certificate and may contract with the Department of Human Resources to give the examinations.
 Examinations shall be prepared by the board with the advice and assistance of a committee of five assessors selected by the California Assessors’ Association for this purpose. A certificate shall not be issued to any assessor or person employed by the office of the county assessor who has not attained a passing grade in the examination and demonstrated to the board that he or she is competent to make change in ownership or exemption decisions, or
 both, as that competency is defined in regulations duly adopted by the board. However, any applicant for a certificate who is denied a certificate pursuant to this section shall have a right to a review of that denial in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(d) This section does not apply to an assessor or any person employed by the office of the county assessor holding a valid appraiser’s or advanced appraiser’s certificate issued by the board.

(e) The board shall not impose any charge upon a county or
 city and county or an applicant for an examination or certification under this section or for training conducted by the board under Section 675.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 446, Sec. 3.   (AB 1534)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

675.

(a) (1) In order to retain a valid certificate, every certified assessment analyst shall complete at least 24 hours of training conducted or approved by the board in each one-year period.

(2) Any training time in excess of the 24-hour minimum that is accumulated in any one year shall be carried over as credit for future training requirements, with a limit of three years in which the carryover time may be credited.

(3) Failure to complete training in accordance with this subdivision shall constitute grounds for revocation of a certificate. A proceeding to revoke shall be conducted in accordance
 with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with
 Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(4) Training shall include, but not be limited to, new developments in applicable case law, statutory law, and administrative rules.

(b) (1) The board shall issue an advanced assessment analyst certificate for an applicant that has held a certificate issued in accordance with Section 674 for at least three years and has done at least one of the following:

(A) Has successfully completed an advanced course of study prescribed pursuant to paragraph (2).

(B) Has passed an advanced level examination prepared pursuant to paragraph (2).

(2) The board, with the advice and assistance of five assessors
 selected by the California Assessors’ Association, shall prescribe an advanced course of study and prepare the advanced level examination.

(3) In order to retain a valid advanced assessment analyst certificate, every holder shall complete at least 12 hours of training in each one-year period.

(4) Any training time for the advanced assessment analyst certificate that is in excess of the 12-hour minimum accumulated in any one year shall be carried over as a credit for future training requirements, with a limit of two years in which the carryover time may be credited.

(5) Failure to complete training in accordance with this subdivision shall constitute grounds for revocation of an advanced assessment
 analyst certificate. A proceeding to revoke shall be conducted in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act
 (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(6) Training to retain the advanced assessment analyst certificate shall include, but not be limited to, new developments in applicable case law, statutory law, and administrative rules.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 446, Sec. 3.   (AB 1534)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

676.

(a) At the time of certification, each applicant shall disclose, on forms provided by the board, his or her financial interest in any legal entity. Thereafter, the form shall be completed annually.

(b) If the applicant is also required to annually file with the Fair Political Practices Commission pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 87300) of Chapter 7 of Title 9 of the Government Code, a duplicate of that filing shall meet the requirements of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 446, Sec. 3.   (AB 1534)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

677.

The board may issue a temporary certificate to an assessor who is newly elected or appointed or to any person newly employed by the office of the county assessor in order to afford the person the opportunity to apply for and take an examination, the successful passage of which would qualify the person for a certificate pursuant to this article. The board shall not issue a temporary certificate for a duration that exceeds one year, unless the person has been duly elected or appointed to the office of assessor.
 The board shall not renew a temporary certificate.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 446, Sec. 3.   (AB 1534)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

678.

The board may issue an interim certificate to a current assessor or to any person who is currently employed by the office of the county assessor, and who is making change in ownership or exemption decisions in order to afford that person the opportunity to apply for and take an examination, the successful passage of which would qualify the person for a certificate pursuant to this article. The board shall not issue an interim certificate for a duration that exceeds four years, unless the person has
 been duly elected or appointed to the office of assessor. The board shall not renew an interim certificate.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 446, Sec. 3.   (AB 1534)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

679.

This article shall not be construed to impede an assessor from managing his or her staff resources efficiently, and in a manner that allows noncertificated staff to prepare and work with exemption applications and change in ownership documents, provided that the noncertificated staff are not responsible for making exemption or change in ownership decisions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 446, Sec. 3.   (AB 1534)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

680.

This article shall only apply in counties or cities and counties that have passed a resolution upon the recommendation of the assessor to require certification as provided by this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 446, Sec. 3.   (AB 1534)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Consultant Contracts [681. - 681.]

681.

(a) All contracts for the performance of appraisal work for assessors by any person who is not an employee of the state, any county, or any city shall be entered into only after at least two competitive bids and shall be entered into either on a fixed fee basis or on the basis of an hourly rate with a maximum dollar amount.

(b) In addition to any provision in the Real Estate Appraisers’ Licensing and Certification Law (Part 3 (commencing with Section 11300) of Division 4 of the Business and Professions Code), a contractor shall maintain the confidentiality of assessee information and records as provided in Sections 408, 451, and 481 that is obtained
 in performance of the contract.

(1) A request for information and records from an assessee shall be made by the assessor. The assessor may authorize a contractor to request additional information or records, if needed. However, a contractor shall not request that information or records without the written authorization of the assessor.

(2) A contractor shall not provide appraisal data in his or her possession to the assessor or a contractor of another county who is not a party to the contract. An assessor may provide that data to the assessor of another county as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 408.

(c) A contractor may not retain information contained in, or derived from, an assessee’s confidential information and
 records after the conclusion, termination, or nonrenewal of the contract. Within 90 days of the conclusion, termination, or nonrenewal of the contract, the contractor shall:

(1) Purge and return to the assessor any assessee records, whether originals, copies, or electronically stored, provided by the assessor or otherwise obtained from the assessee.

(2) Provide a written declaration to the assessor that the contractor has complied with this subdivision.

(d) All contracts entered into pursuant to subdivision (a) shall include a provision incorporating the requirements of subdivisions (b) and (c). This provision of the contract shall use language that is prescribed by the State Board of Equalization.

(e) For purposes of this section, a “contractor” means any person who is not an employee of the state, any county, or any city who performs appraisal work pursuant to a contract with an assessor.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 674 by Stats. 2015, Ch. 446, Sec. 2.   (AB 1534)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Assessment by State Board of Equalization Generally [721. - 868.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [721. - 725.]

721.

The board shall annually value and assess all of the taxable property within the state that is to be assessed by it pursuant to Section 19 of Article XIII of the Constitution and any legislative authorization thereunder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 877.)
-------------------------------------------

721.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 721 or any other provision of law to the contrary, commencing with the lien date for the 2003–04 fiscal year, the board shall annually assess every electric generation facility with a generating capacity of 50 megawatts or more that is owned or operated by an electrical corporation, as defined in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 218 of the Public Utilities Code.

(b) For purposes of subdivision (a), “electric generation facility” does not include a qualifying small power production facility or a qualifying cogeneration facility within the meaning of Sections 201 and 210 of Title II of the federal Public Utility Regulatory Policies Act of 1978 (16 U.S.C. Secs. 796(17) and (18) and 824a-3), and the regulations adopted for those sections
 under that act by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission (18 C.F.R. 292.101-292.602), or a facility producing power from other than a conventional power source that is an exempt wholesale generator, as defined in the federal Public Utility Holding Company Act of 2005 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 16451(6)).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 92, Sec. 185.   (SB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

722.

State-assessed property shall be assessed at its fair market value or full value as of 12:01 a.m. on the first day of January. The board shall annually prepare an assessment roll of the assessments made by it for transmittal to county auditors and city auditors as hereinafter provided in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1457, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

722.5.

(a) Real property assessed by the board pursuant to Section 19 of Article XIII of the California Constitution on January 1, which thereafter becomes subject to local assessment, shall not be assessed locally during the remainder of the assessment year, except as provided in Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 75) of Part 0.5 of Division 1.

(b) Personal property that becomes subject to board assessment after January 1, and real property that becomes subject to board assessment on or after January 1, and on or before the following January 1, shall not be state assessed until the assessment year commencing on the latter January 1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 499, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

723.

The board may use the principle of unit valuation in valuing properties of an assessee that are operated as a unit in a primary function of the assessee. When so valued, those properties are known as “unitary property.” Property of an assessee not valued through the use of the principle of unit valuation are known as “nonunitary property.” When valuing nonunitary property, the board shall consider current market value information of comparable properties provided by the assessor just prior to the reappraisal by the board of that property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 694, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

723.1.

Operating nonunitary properties are those that the assessee and its regulatory agency consider to be operating as a unit, but the board considers not part of the unit in the primary function of the assessee. This section does not apply to state-assessed property of regulated railway companies. In the case of regulated railway companies, there shall be only two classifications of property for purposes of this code, unitary and nonunitary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 921, Sec. 4.   Effective September 22, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

724.

Whenever any act is required or allowed to be done on or before a date specified in this chapter and that day is a Saturday, Sunday or holiday, the act may be performed timely during the next following business day.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 877.)
-------------------------------------------

725.

The failure to receive any notice required to be given by the board or the failure of the board to complete any action by a date specified under this chapter, shall not affect the validity of an assessment or the validity of any taxes levied pursuant thereto. When any notice given by the board pursuant to this chapter provides for a time period of less than 10 days, the notice shall also be communicated by telephone on the day the notice is dated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 877.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Assessments [731. - 733.]

731.

Each year between the first day of January and the first day of June, upon valuing the unitary property of an assessee, the board shall mail to the assessee, at its address as shown in the records of the board, a notice stating the amount of the assessed value of the assessee’s unitary property. The notice shall advise the assessee that a petition for reassessment of the unitary property may be filed, not later than July 20 of the year of the notice, at the headquarters of the board in Sacramento.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 647, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

732.

Each year between the first day of January and the last day of July, upon valuing the nonunitary property of an assessee, the board shall mail to the assessee at its address shown in the records of the board a notice stating the amount of the assessed value of the assessee’s nonunitary property. The notice shall advise the assessee that a petition for reassessment of the nonunitary property may be filed, not later than September 20 of the year of the notice, at the headquarters of the board in Sacramento.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 647, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

733.

(a) If a timely petition for reassessment is not filed with the board, an assessment of unitary or nonunitary property of the assessee shall become final at the expiration of the period specified for filing a petition in the notice given in accordance with Section 731 or Section 732.

(b) The board may extend the period for filing a petition for reassessment once for a period not to exceed 15 days, provided a written request for the extension is filed with the board prior to the expiration of the period for which the extension may be granted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 647, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Reassessments and Allocation Corrections [741. - 749.]

741.

A petition for reassessment of unitary or nonunitary property shall be in writing and shall state the specific grounds upon which it is claimed a correction or adjustment of the assessment is founded. The petition shall be delivered to the board at its headquarters office in Sacramento.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 877.)
-------------------------------------------

742.

Upon receipt of a timely petition for reassessment, the board shall set a time and place within the state for hearing on the petition. Notice thereof shall be mailed to the assessee at its address as shown in the records of the board, not less than 10 working days in advance of the date of the hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 821, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

743.

The hearing may be continued by the board for good cause. The hearing shall be open to the public, except that upon conclusion of the taking of evidence the board may deliberate in private with the aid of its staff in reaching a conclusion. Upon written request, the board shall make a full record of the hearing and furnish the petitioner with a transcript thereof at the petitioner’s expense.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 261, Sec. 20.5.)
-------------------------------------------

744.

(a) The board shall notify the petitioner of its decision on a petition for reassessment by mail and shall make written findings and conclusions if requested at or prior to the commencement of the hearing. The board shall send a periodic report of its decisions and any written findings and conclusions thereon to each county in which affected state-assessed property is situated. The findings shall fairly disclose the board’s determination of material factual issues and shall contain a statement of the method or methods of valuation used by the board in valuing the property. Notwithstanding the requirement for a statement of method or methods, the board’s approval of a settlement of a lawsuit contesting the value of state-assessed property shall be sufficient disclosure when value is determined in accordance with a board-approved settlement. Decisions of the board on petitions for reassessment of state-assessed property shall be completed on or before December 31.

(b) When the value of an assessee’s state-assessed property is determined, after a hearing on a petition for reassessment, to be different from the value originally adopted by the board, the board shall determine the year in which the corrected value is to be entered on the roll. The correct value may be entered on the roll for the fiscal year in which the determination is made, or the difference between the original and the corrected value may be entered as an increase or decrease in the assessment for the succeeding fiscal year. If the corrected value is entered on the roll for the fiscal year in which it is determined, and the board roll has been transmitted to the county auditors, the board shall make the corresponding changes in allocations and transmit the roll corrections to the county auditor.

(c) If the amount of the correction is to be entered on the roll for the succeeding fiscal year, an amount is to be added in lieu of interest. If the correction results in a reduction in assessed value, there shall be added to the reduction, in lieu of interest, 9 percent of the difference between the original assessed value and the reduced assessed value. If the correction results in an increase in assessed value, there shall be added to the increase, in lieu of interest, 9 percent of the difference between the original assessed value and the increased assessed value.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 497, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

745.

The assessment of the unitary and operating nonunitary property of an assessee shall be allocated to assessments on the roll prepared by the board among the counties in which parts of the unitary and operating nonunitary property are situated. The assessment of the nonunitary property of an assessee shall be placed on the assessment roll prepared by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1457, Sec. 14.)
-------------------------------------------

746.

Each year, upon or prior to the completion of the assessment roll prepared by the board, but not later than June 15, the board shall mail notice to each assessee at its address as shown on the records of the board, of the allocated assessed values of the assessee’s unitary property that have been or are proposed to be placed on the assessment roll to be transmitted to county auditors. The notice shall advise the assessee that a petition for a correction of an allocated assessment may be filed, not later than July 20 of the year of the notice, at the headquarters of the board in Sacramento.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 647, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

747.

A petition for correction of an allocated assessment shall be in writing and state the specific grounds upon which it is claimed a correction or adjustment in the allocation is founded. The value of the total unitary property of an assessee may not be brought into issue in a petition for correction of an allocated assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 877.)
-------------------------------------------

748.

Upon receipt of a timely petition for correction of an allocated assessment, the board shall set a time and place within the state for hearing on the petition. Notice thereof shall be mailed to the assessee at its address as shown on the records of the board not less than 10 working days in advance of the date of the hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 647, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

749.

Section 743 shall be applicable to hearings on petitions for correction of an allocated assessment and the board shall notify the petitioner of its decision by mail. The decision shall include written findings and conclusions of the board if requested at or prior to the commencement of the hearing. Decisions of the board on petitions for correction of an allocated assessment shall be completed on or before December 31.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 744, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Assessment Estimates and Assessment Roll [755. - 760.]

755.

(a) On or before July 15, the board shall transmit to each county auditor an estimate of the total unitary value and operating nonunitary value of state-assessed property in the county and of nonunitary state-assessed property in each revenue district in the county. An estimate need not be made for a revenue district that did not levy a tax or assessment during the preceding year unless the board receives on or before January 1 preceding the fiscal year for which the levy is to be made a notice in writing of the proposed levy. The estimate shall be regarded as establishing the total assessed value of state-assessed property in the county and each revenue district in the county for the purpose of determining tax rates, subject only to those changes
 as may be transmitted on or prior to July 31. All information furnished pursuant to this section is at all times during office hours open to inspection by any interested person or entity.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), in making the estimate referred to in subdivision (a), the value of property described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 100.1 and the nonunitary value of the property of regulated railway companies, property subject to subdivisions (i), (j), (k), and (l) of Section 100, and property subject to Section 100.9 shall be allocated by revenue district.

(c) The amendments made to this section by the act that added this subdivision apply for the 2007–08 fiscal year and for each fiscal year thereafter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 433, Sec. 3.   (AB 308)   Effective September 29, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

756.

(a) On or before July 31, the board shall transmit to each county auditor a roll showing the unitary and operating nonunitary assessments made by the board in the county and the nonoperating nonunitary assessments made by the board in each city and revenue district in the county; provided, however, that the roll need not show the assessments made by the board in a revenue district which did not levy a tax or assessment during the preceding year. The roll is at all times, during office hours, open to the inspection of any person representing any taxing agency or revenue district, or any district described in Section 2131. If the roll does not show the assessments in a revenue district as herein provided and a notice of a proposed levy is furnished to
 the board in writing, on or before January 1 preceding the fiscal year for which the levy is to be made, the board shall furnish an estimate of the total assessed value of nonoperating nonunitary state-assessed property in the district and shall transmit thereafter to the county auditor a statement of roll change showing the nonoperating nonunitary assessments made by the board in the district.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), in making the roll referred to in subdivision (a), the value of property described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 100.1 and the nonunitary value of the property of regulated railway companies, property subject to subdivisions (i), (j), (k), and (l) of Section 100, and property subject to Section 100.9 shall be enrolled by revenue district.

(c) The amendments made to this section by the act that added this subdivision apply for the 2007–08
 fiscal year and for each fiscal year thereafter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 433, Sec. 4.   (AB 308)   Effective September 29, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

758.

If the board roll has been transmitted to the local auditors, the board may make an assessment of escaped property or a roll correction. At least 30 days prior to transmitting a statement of assessment of escaped property or making a roll correction, the board shall notify the assessee whose property’s full value has increased as a result of an escape assessment or roll correction of the assessed value of that property as it shall appear on the corrected roll. The notice shall be mailed to the assessee at its address shown in the records of the board. The notice shall advise the assessee of the date by which and the place where a petition for reassessment may be filed. The date for filing the petition shall not be less than 50 days from the date of the mailing of the notice of value. The provisions of Sections 741 to 744, inclusive, shall be applicable to petitions and hearings pursuant to this section except for the dates prescribed for decisions of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 647, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

759.
